Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 5. Employer Contributions
§ 27-3-506.
Notice of rates and charges; relief, review or redetermination.

The department shall notify an employer of his contribution rate determined pursuant to this article and of total benefit charges to his account within a reasonable time after the close of each experience period. A base period employer shall be notified of the filing of all initial claims which may be charged to his account. Except as otherwise provided by the legislature and on or before January 1 of each year, the department shall notify each employer of his projected contributions payable under W.S.

27-3-503

and

27-3-505

for the ensuing calendar year. Notice under this section shall be by mail to the last known address of record.

A determination of contribution rates by the department for any calendar year is binding upon the employer unless within thirty (30) days after notice is mailed, he files an application for review and redetermination in accordance with this section.

An employer may apply in writing to the department within twenty-eight (28) days after the mailing or delivery of notice of benefits charged to his account for relief of benefit charges under W.S. 27-3-504(e)(i), (ii), (iv) or (viii). The application shall state the reasons for relief. Determinations of benefits not charged to an employer’s account and which are paid from the trust fund shall be recorded and shall specify the reasons therefor. The records are open to inspection by an employer or his legal representative.

An employer may apply to the department for review of a decision or determination involving contribution liability, contribution rates or the charging of benefit payments under W.S.

27-3-509

. The application shall be in writing and shall state the reasons for review. The department, on behalf of the commission, shall notify the employer of its acceptance or denial of the application for review or of a redetermination by the commission. If the commission grants review, the employer shall be given opportunity for hearing in accordance with W.S.

27-3-401

through

27-3-409

to the extent not inconsistent with this article. An employer in any proceeding involving contribution rates or liability may not contest benefits paid and charged to his account in accordance with a determination, redetermination or decision pursuant to W.S.

27-3-401

through

27-3-409

unless he was not a party to the proceeding. A denial or redetermination is final unless within thirty (30) days after notice is mailed a petition for judicial review is filed in accordance with W.S.

27-3-407

.

An employer’s account shall not be relieved of charges relating to a payment that was made erroneously from the unemployment compensation fund after July 1, 2013 if the department determines that:

The erroneous payment was made because the employer, or the agent of the employer, was at fault for failing to respond timely or adequately to a written request, sent by United States mail or by electronic mail, from the department for information relating to the claim for benefits which resulted in the erroneous payment; and

The employer or agent has established a pattern of failing to respond timely or adequately to requests similar to those identified in paragraph (i) of this subsection.

For purposes of subsection (e) of this section, “timely” means within fifteen (15) days after a notice or request is sent by United States mail or by electronic mail to the address of record of the employer or employer’s agent. The department shall acknowledge receipt of the requested information within fifteen (15) days, if requested by the employer or the employer’s agent. Acknowledgment shall be by United States mail or electronic mail.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, §§ 7, 11; 1939, ch. 124, §§ 11, 15; 1941, ch. 96, § 10; 1943, ch. 58, § 5; 1945, ch. 81, § 7; C.S. 1945, §§ 54-107, 54-111; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 6 to 9, 11; 1953, ch. 111, §§ 5 to 7; 1957, ch. 88, §§ 6, 7; W.S. 1957, §§ 27-28, 27-33; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 9, 10; 1965, ch. 186, § 1; 1967, ch. 71, § 1; ch. 215, § 2; 1969, ch. 59, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, §§ 9, 16; 1973, ch. 79, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

27-3-108

, 27-3-113; Laws 1979, ch. 51, § 1; ch. 141, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 133, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1995, ch. 13, § 1; 2004, ch. 86, § 1; 2013 ch. 133, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c), substituted “(ii), (iv) or (viii)” for “(ii) or (iv).”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (e) and (f).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence in (c), substituted “twenty-eight (28) days” for “fifteen (15) days”; and in (d), added “to the extent not inconsistent with this article” at the end of the fourth sentence.

Timely filing of rate determinations mandatory. —

Timely filing under subsection (b) of employer rate determinations is just as mandatory and jurisdictional as it is under §

27-3-404

. Thus, failure to timely file bars review. Wyoming Dep't of Employment v. Wyoming Restaurant Assocs., 859 P.2d 1281,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1993).

Payments not required before seeking judicial review. —

Neither this section nor §

27-3-515

requires that an employer make all delinquent payments in order to seek judicial review. Wyoming Dep't of Employment v. Wyoming Restaurant Assocs., 859 P.2d 1281,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1993).

Quoted

in

Wyo. Dep't of Empl. v. Jolley, Castillo, Drennon, Ltd., 2010 WY 48, 229 P.3d 955,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Apr. 22, 2010).

Stated

in

Hupp v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 715 P.2d 223,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 27-3-507.
Person acquiring trade of employing unit; transfer of experience and assignment of rates.

A person acquiring the trade, organization, business or substantially all the assets of an employer subject to this act shall assume the employer’s account, benefit experience and contribution rate. If the acquiring person is an employer subject to this act, the department shall consolidate the separate accounts and benefit experience and shall determine the contribution rate of the acquiring person effective the first day of the calendar quarter following the date of acquisition. A delinquency rate shall be assumed by the acquiring person as provided in W.S. 27-3-503(b) when the acquiring person owned or controlled an interest in the transferring employer or if the acquiring person is a member of the immediate family of the transferring employer.

The transfer of some or all of an employer’s workforce to another person shall be considered a transfer of trade or business when, as a result of the transfer, the transferring employer no longer performs trade or business with respect to the transferred workforce, and the trade or business is performed by the person to whom the workforce is transferred.

If an employer transfers all or a portion of its trade or business to another employer and, at the time of the transfer, there is substantially common ownership, management or control of the two (2) employers, then the unemployment insurance experience attributable to the transferred trade or business shall be transferred to the employer to whom the business is transferred. The rates of both employers shall be recalculated and made effective the first day of the calendar quarter immediately following the date of the transfer of trade or business. Both employers may be given a delinquency rate as provided in W.S. 27-3-503(b) if applicable.

If, following a transfer of experience under this section, the department determines that a substantial purpose of the transfer of the trade or business was to obtain a reduced liability for contributions, then the accounts of the employers involved shall be combined into a single account and a single rate assigned to the account.

If a person is not an employer under this section at the time the person acquires the trade or business of an employer, the unemployment insurance experience of the acquired employer shall not be transferred to the person if the department finds that the person acquired the trade or business of the employer solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower rate of contributions. Instead, the person shall be assigned the applicable new employer rate under W.S. 27-3-503(b). In determining whether the trade or business was acquired solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower rate of contributions, the department shall use objective factors which may include the cost of acquiring the business, whether the person continued the business enterprise of the acquired business, how long the business enterprise was continued, or whether a substantial number of new employees were hired for performance of duties unrelated to the business activity conducted prior to acquisition.

The department shall establish procedures to identify the transfer or acquisition of a business for purposes of this section and W.S.

27-3-706

.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 7; 1939, ch. 124, § 11; 1943, ch. 58, § 5; 1945, ch. 81, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 54-107; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 6 to 9; 1953, ch. 111, §§ 5 to 7; 1957, ch. 88, §§ 6, 7; W.S. 1957, § 27-28; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 9, 10; 1965, ch. 186, § 1; 1967, ch. 215, § 2; 1969, ch. 59, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, §§ 9, 16; 1973, ch. 79, § 1; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 51, § 1; ch. 141, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 133, § 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 83, § 1; 1999, ch. 114, § 1; 2005, ch. 186, § 2; 2010, ch. 66, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, prescribing the contribution rate upon transfer of a business.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), inserted the present second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Suit for declaratory judgment was not properly brought

where the plaintiff sought full review of the agency decision assigning the plaintiff, pursuant to this section, the delinquent account of an acquired employer, as opposed to seeking only the interpretation of this section. Wyomedia Corp. v. Division of Unemployment Ins. of Wyo. Dep't of Employment, 824 P.2d 564,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. Feb. 20, 1992).

Applied

in

Wyoming Dep't of Emp. v. Wyoming Restaurant Assocs., 859 P.2d 1281,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1993).

Quoted

in

General Chem. Corp. v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n, 902 P.2d 716,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 27-3-508.
Rates for joint ventures.

A joint venture composed of two (2) or more employers with accounts meeting the requirements of W.S. 27-3-503(b) and (c) shall apply in writing to the department within four (4) months after the date of formation of the joint venture for determination of a contribution rate. The department shall, upon receipt of application and pursuant to this article, assign a contribution rate based upon the benefit ratio computed on the consolidation of the separate accounts and benefit experiences of the employers for the experience period. The contribution rate shall be determined and assigned by the department to the joint venture each calendar year until its separate account and benefit experience qualify as an experience period.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 7; 1939, ch. 124, § 11; 1943, ch. 58, § 5; 1945, ch. 81, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 54-107; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 6 to 9; 1953, ch. 111, §§ 5 to 7; 1957, ch. 88, §§ 6, 7; W.S. 1957, § 27-28; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 9, 10; 1965, ch. 186, § 1; 1967, ch. 215, § 2; 1969, ch. 59, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, §§ 9, 16; 1973, ch. 79, § 1; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 51, § 1; ch. 141, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 133, § 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2.

Quoted

in

General Chem. Corp. v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n, 902 P.2d 716,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 27-3-509.
Election of substitute payments by certain organizations authorized; filing and liability period; billing; posting of security; exceptions.

An organization or nonprofit organization defined by W.S. 27-3-501(a)(v) and (vi) and subject to this act may instead of paying contributions otherwise required by this article, elect to pay an amount determined pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. If an organization or nonprofit organization elects payment liability at the time it is determined an employer subject to this act, it shall file written notice of its election with the department not later than thirty (30) days following the date of determination. Liability for payments shall be at least one (1) year from the date of determination and shall continue until written notice is filed with the department terminating its election. Notice shall be filed not later than thirty (30) days before the beginning of the taxable year for which the termination is effective. An organization or nonprofit organization previously paying contributions under this act may file written notice of election for payment liability with the department not later than thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of any taxable year. The election shall not be changed for at least two (2) years from the effective date.

The department may for good cause extend the required filing period for notice of election or termination and may permit an election to be retroactive to January 1 of the year in which the election is made. It shall notify an organization of its determination of employer status, the effective date of an election and a termination of election. Determinations are subject to reconsideration, appeal and review in accordance with W.S.

27-3-506

.

At the end of each calendar quarter or other period determined by the department, the department shall bill each nonprofit organization electing payment liability under this section for an amount equal to the total amount of regular benefits plus one-half (1/2) of the amount of extended benefits paid during the quarter or other prescribed period attributable to employment in the nonprofit organization. An organization electing payment liability under this section shall be billed in a similar manner for an amount equal to the total amount of extended benefits attributable to employment by the organization during the billing period. Payment shall be made not later than thirty (30) days after the bill is mailed or delivered unless an application for review and redetermination is filed. Payments shall not be deducted from employee wages and if not paid when due, the employer is subject to interest under this article. The department shall notify each employer of transactions affecting its account and its right to review pursuant to W.S.

27-3-506

.

The commission may by regulation require an employer electing payments under this section to post surety bonds or other securities.

Noncharging provisions under W.S. 27-3-409(a) and 27-3-504(e) and the right to protest benefit charges under W.S. 27-3-506(c) do not apply to employers electing payments under this section.

Any employer failing to make required payments under this section, including assessments of interest and penalties, within ninety (90) days after receipt of a bill, shall not be eligible for making payments under this section for the following tax year unless full payment is received by the department before the contribution rates for the next tax year are computed under this act, subject to the following:

Any employer losing the option to make payments under this section because of late payments or nonpayment under this subsection shall have the option reinstated if after one (1) year, all contributions have been paid on a timely basis and no contributions, payments instead of contributions for paid benefits, penalties or interest remain outstanding;

Failure of the tribe or any tribal unit to make payments required under this section including assessment of interest and penalties, after exhaustion of all collection efforts determined necessary by the department, shall exclude services performed for the tribe from employment for purposes of W.S. 27-3-105(a)(iii);

Upon termination or reinstatement of any tribe or tribal unit under this section, the department shall notify the United States internal revenue service and the United States department of labor;

Notice of payment and reporting delinquency to any Indian tribe or tribal unit under this subsection shall include information that failure to make full payment within the prescribed time:

Imposes a tax liability upon the tribe under the federal Unemployment Tax Act;

Eliminates eligibility of the tribe for election of payments under this section;

May result in exclusion of the tribe as an employer under this act as defined by W.S. 27-3-103(a)(x) and the exclusion of services performed for the tribe from employment covered under this act pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 7; 1939, ch. 124, § 11; 1943, ch. 58, § 5; 1945, ch. 81, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 54-107; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 6 to 9; 1953, ch. 111, §§ 5 to 7; 1957, ch. 88, §§ 6, 7; W.S. 1957, § 27-28; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 9, 10; 1965, ch. 186, § 1; 1967, ch. 215, § 2; 1969, ch. 59, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, §§ 9, 16; 1973, ch. 79, § 1; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 51, § 1; ch. 141, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 133, § 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2001, ch. 67, § 1; 2010, ch. 66, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the introductory language of (f), substituted “Any employer failing” for “Any Indian tribe or tribal unit failing”; in (f)(i), substituted “Any employer losing” for “Any Indian tribe losing.”.

Unemployment Tax Act. —

The federal Unemployment Tax Act appears as 26 U.S.C. § 3301 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-510.
Delinquencies; interest to be charged; deposit; collection by civil action; jeopardy assessments; posting of bond; liability of corporate officers and directors.

Contributions not paid on the date due shall bear interest of two percent (2%) per month or any fractional portion thereof from the due date until payment plus accrued interest is received by the department. Interest collected pursuant to this subsection shall be paid into the employment security revenue account.

If after notice an employer defaults in any contribution or interest payment, the amount due shall be collected by civil action in the name of the department. An employer adjudged liable shall pay the costs of the action. Civil actions brought under this subsection shall be given preference over all other civil actions except petitions for judicial review under this act and cases under the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act [§

27-14-101

et seq.].

If an employer or employing unit neglects or refuses to submit reports and pay contributions or interest required by this act, discontinues business at any of its places of business or leaves this state without submitting reports and paying contributions or interest and the neglect, refusal, discontinuance or removal jeopardizes the fund or any rights to benefits, the department may make a jeopardy assessment against the employer or employing unit. The department shall immediately notify the employer of the assessment in writing by mail. The assessment is final unless the employer files a written protest of the assessment with the department within fifteen (15) days after mailing. An employer filing a protest may request a hearing before the commission in writing. After the hearing the department shall notify the employer of findings of the commission. If an assessment is made, it is final upon issuance of notice and the department shall collect the assessment of any delinquent contributions or interest.

The department may require any employing unit which has been habitually delinquent in making contributions, filing returns or qualifying as required by this act to file a bond or other security with the department which will insure the payment of future contributions required by this act.

Any officer or director having at least twenty percent (20%) ownership interest of a corporate employing unit and any manager of a limited liability company having at least twenty percent (20%) ownership interest of a limited liability company employing unit, who controls or supervises filing contribution reports or making payment contributions under this act and who fails to file the reports or make required payments, and the employing unit fails to pay the amounts due the department, is liable for the contributions or reimbursement including interest, penalties and costs. Liability under this subsection shall:

Survive dissolution, reorganization, bankruptcy, receivership or assignment for the benefit of creditors of or by the corporate or limited liability company employing unit;

Be initially determined by the department. The department’s determination is final unless the officer or director determined to be liable files a written appeal within fifteen (15) days after the date notice of the determination is mailed to his address or the address of the corporate or limited liability company employing unit. The burden of proof rests with the department and the appeal shall be conducted in the manner provided under W.S.

27-3-506

for appeals from employer liability determinations.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 14; 1939, ch. 124, § 18; 1941, ch. 96, § 13; C.S. 1945, § 54-114; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 27-29; Laws 1967, ch. 216, § 3; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-109

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2; 1984, ch. 50, § 2; 1987, ch. 130, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 83 § 1; 1993, ch. 76, § 1; 1997, ch. 93, § 1; 2010, ch. 66, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the state unemployment insurance trust fund, see §

27-3-209

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the introductory language of (e), substituted “and who fails” for “and who willfully fails.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Excuse for failure to file return within limitation provisions of Internal Revenue Code, 30 ALR2d 452.

Construction, application and effect, with respect to social security and unemployment compensation taxes, of statutes imposing penalties for tax evasion or default, 22 ALR3d 8.

§ 27-3-511.
Delinquencies; lien; foreclosure; notice and hearing; satisfaction and release; remedies not exclusive.

If contributions or interest under this act are not paid on the date due, the department may file a lien certificate verified under oath with the county clerk of the county in which the employer has his principal place of business and a copy with any other county. The certificate shall state the amount of the contributions and interest due, the name and last known address of the delinquent employer and that the department complied with computation and levy requirements for contributions and interest under this act. The county clerk shall number, file and index the certificate under employment security contributions’ liens and under chattel mortgages.

The amount of contributions and interest due the department is a lien upon all real and personal property including motor vehicles owned or acquired by the employer. The lien is in effect from the time of filing the certificate and covers all property of the employer in any county in which filed. The department may initiate proceedings for foreclosure in district court within ten (10) years from the date of filing. After the date of filing, no person shall remove property subject to a lien under this section from the state.

Before filing the certificate, the delinquent employer shall be given opportunity for hearing before the commission or its duly authorized representative. Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be mailed at least fifteen (15) days prior to the hearing. If the delinquent employer or his representative fails to appear at the hearing or fails to establish to the satisfaction of the commission that contributions and interest are erroneous, the department may file the certificate. The certificate may be filed without opportunity for hearing if a delinquent employer is leaving the state with intent to default.

If a lien is entered and the contributions are paid or found erroneous, the department shall file notice of satisfaction of the lien certificate with the county clerk of any county in which the lien is filed. The department may release any property from the lien or subordinate the lien if it determines contributions and interest are secured by a lien on other property or the collection of contributions and interest is not in jeopardy. The department shall certify release or subordination under this subsection.

The remedies provided by this section are not exclusive.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department may enter into installment payment agreements for delinquent tax and interest liabilities where repayment requirements are met and where payment in a lump sum would cause severe inconvenience to the taxpayer.

For purposes of this section, “employer” includes those individuals described in W.S. 27-3-510(e) under the conditions described in that section.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 14; 1939, ch. 124, § 18; 1941, ch. 96, § 13; C.S. 1945, § 54-114; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 27-29; Laws 1967, ch. 216, § 3; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-109

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1999, ch. 73, § 2; 2010, ch. 66, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (f) and (g).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Priority of liens.—

Lien against real property created by a certificate of purchase for delinquent taxes was superior to any lien held by the State of Wyoming, Department of Workforce Services, for unpaid contributions and interest to the Wyoming unemployment compensation fund. Brock v. Wyo. ex rel. Wyo. Workforce Servs., Unemployment Ins. Div., 2017 WY 47, 394 P.3d 460,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 27-3-512.
Priority over other claims under receivership.

If an employer’s assets are distributed by court order under receivership, assignment, adjudicated insolvency or other proceeding, contributions under this act [§§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

] shall have priority over all claims except taxes and claims for wages of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) per claimant and earned within six (6) months before the proceeding. Priority of contributions in cases adjudicated under 11 U.S.C. § 101 et seq. shall be as provided by 11 U.S.C. § 507(a).

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 14; 1939, ch. 124, § 18; 1941, ch. 96, § 13; C.S. 1945, § 54-114; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 27-29; Laws 1967, ch. 216, § 3; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-109

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Priority of liens.—

Lien against real property created by a certificate of purchase for delinquent taxes was superior to any lien held by the State of Wyoming, Department of Workforce Services, for unpaid contributions and interest to the Wyoming unemployment compensation fund. Brock v. Wyo. ex rel. Wyo. Workforce Servs., Unemployment Ins. Div., 2017 WY 47, 394 P.3d 460,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 27-3-513.
Prevention of collection prohibited.

A court shall not prevent the collection of any contributions under this act [§§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

].

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 14; 1939, ch. 124, § 18; 1941, ch. 96, § 13; C.S. 1945, § 54-114; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 27-29; Laws 1967, ch. 216, § 3; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-109

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-514.
Action for recovery of payments under protest; procedure.

An employer paying contributions under protest may within six (6) months after payment initiate action for recovery against the department in a court of competent jurisdiction. The protest shall be verified and filed at the time payment is made and shall state the grounds for objection. Failure to initiate action within six (6) months is a waiver of recovery under this subsection. Review by the court is limited to the objections stated in the protest. If judgment is for the employer, the amount shall be credited to his account for contributions and interest due under this act. Any remaining balance shall be refunded to the employer from the clearing account.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 14; 1939, ch. 124, § 18; 1941, ch. 96, § 13; C.S. 1945, § 54-114; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 27-29; Laws 1967, ch. 216, § 3; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-109

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Payment of taxes under protest not required. —

The language used in this section does not require that an employer, appealing its tax rate determination, pay its delinquent taxes under protest before it can obtain judicial review. Instead, it simply provides a cause of action to an employer, who is paying taxes under protest, to seek recovery of those taxes. Wyoming Dep't of Employment v. Wyoming Restaurant Assocs., 859 P.2d 1281,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 27-3-515.
Adjustment or refund for erroneous collection; reduction of contributions and interest in certain cases; recovery by department.

An employer may apply to the commission or the commission may on its own motion provide for an adjustment of contributions or interest or for a refund if the adjustment cannot be made. This subsection applies only to payments made within three (3) years before the date of application or determination. Upon determination of an erroneous collection, the department shall grant an adjustment without interest for future contribution payments or if the adjustment cannot be made, refund the amount without interest from the fund.

The department may upon its own motion or written application reduce or waive the amount of interest due under W.S. 27-3-510(a) if the collection of the full amount of interest is against equity and good conscience. If an employer is no longer subject to this act pursuant to W.S.

27-3-502

, the department may reduce or cancel the amount of contributions or interest due upon a determination based on findings entered into the record that the employer is:

Adjudicated insolvent by a court of competent jurisdiction with no remaining assets;

Deceased with no estate or the estate is closed and all assets are distributed;

A dissolved corporation with no remaining assets;

Not found within three (3) years after the date of termination of coverage under this act and has no property located in the state; or

Not capable of paying the total amount due within three (3) years after the date of termination of coverage under this act, has no property in the state and failure to accept a partial amount of the total as settlement may result in a substantial loss to the fund.

Subsection (b) of this section does not prevent the department from collecting the balance of interest and contributions not paid if its action was based upon a misrepresentation or omission of facts or if amounts due under this act are collectible at a future date.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 14; 1939, ch. 124, § 18; 1941, ch. 96, § 13; C.S. 1945, § 54-114; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 27-29; Laws 1967, ch. 216, § 3; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-109

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Payments not required before seeking judicial review. —

Neither §

27-3-506

nor this section requires that an employer make all delinquent payments in order to seek judicial review. Wyoming Dep't of Employment v. Wyoming Restaurant Assocs., 859 P.2d 1281,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 27-3-516.
Incremental bond for impact industries.

Any project in Wyoming with an estimated construction cost equal to or greater than the threshold construction cost defined by the industrial siting council pursuant to W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii), a majority of which is planned to be completed or discontinued within a period of seven (7) years, and which will require the employment of at least two hundred fifty (250) people is subject to this section. After the project is initiated, each employing unit working on a project which meets the criteria specified under this section shall report annually to the department any change in contract bids within the state as may have been determined under subsection (b) of this section.

If the department determines that the project is within the criteria stated by this section, it may assess and collect from the general or prime contractor or, in those situations where there is no general or prime contractor, the owner for whom the project is being constructed, on behalf of each employing unit, an additional amount of one-half percent (.5%) times the successful bid amount on the project awarded to each employing unit but not to exceed one-half percent (.5%) times the total amount allowed under all bids accepted under the project. The amount is in addition to any other contribution required by this act and shall be treated as incremental bond payments to insure payment for all benefits ultimately claimed. The payments are not contributions until the ultimate determination of liability is made under subsection (d) of this section. The department shall amend the amount assessed under this section in accordance with any increases in contract bids reported by an employing unit under subsection (a) of this section. An employing unit may be enjoined by the department from engaging or continuing in business until all payments required under this subsection are made.

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 52, § 2.

The amount collected under this section shall be credited to a separate account. Within one (1) year after completion or discontinuance of the project or after an employing unit completes its phase of the work, the department shall determine the total benefits paid to employees of the employing unit or units and if total contributions made by the units under W.S.

27-3-503

exceed total benefits paid to the employees of the units, the difference plus accrued interest shall be refunded to the appropriate general or prime contractor or the owner who paid the additional contribution under subsection (b) of this section but not exceeding the amount paid under this section plus accrued interest. The amount not refunded shall be credited to the unemployment compensation fund.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 177 § 2.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 50, § 1; 1986, ch. 52, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 103, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2007, ch. 177, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 66, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (d), substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the trust and agency fund.”

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), substituted “one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00)” for “twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000.00)”; and repealed (e), which read: “This section does not apply to any project for which bids are opened prior to March 20, 1984.”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “equal to or greater than the threshold construction cost defined by the industrial siting council pursuant to W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)” for “of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00).”

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 27-3-517.
Electronic delivery of information.

Whenever this article requires any determination, decision or notice to be transmitted through the mail, the determination, decision or notice may be transmitted by an internet application approved by the department but only upon an election by the claimant or employer to receive the information by electronic transmission. Upon the completion of every electronic transmission authorized by this section, the department shall provide to the claimant or employer an electronic acknowledgement specifying the date and time when the transmission was sent or received. Except as otherwise required by rules applicable to appeals to the courts of this state, determinations, decisions or notices transmitted by an approved electronic means may be appealed or protested by use of the same means. For the purpose of all relevant time limits established by this article, electronically transmitted information shall be deemed delivered on the date indicated on the acknowledgment required by this section, or if no acknowledgement exists, on the date the electronic delivery is initiated by the party sending the information.

History.

2017 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 13, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 6, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 13, 2017.